District of Columbia statutes.
24-751.11

[Omitted]

Omitted.

Validity of D.C. Law 14-308: This chapter, consisting of §§ 24-751.01 to 24-751.13, held invalid. The District of Columbia Court of Appeals held that the Treatment Instead of Jail Initiative (Law 14-308) appropriated funds in violation of D.C. Official Code 1-204.101(a) and was impermissibly adopted through the initiative process. District of Columbia Bd. of Elections and Ethics v. District of Columbia, 866 A.2d 788 (D.C. 2005).
All functions of Public Health Service, of the Surgeon General of the Public Health Service, and of all other officers and employees of the Public Health Service, and all functions of all agencies of or in the Public Health Service were transferred to the Secretary of Health, Education, and Welfare by 1966 Reorganization Plan No. 3, 80 Stat. 1610. The functions of the Department of Health, Education, and Welfare were transferred to the Department of Health and Human Services by the Act of October 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 695, Pub. L. 96-88, § 509.